en: asafoetida, hing
ar: حِلْتِيت‎
de: Teufelsdreck
es: asafétida
fa: انگدان‎, انگژد‎, رافه‎, هنگ‎
fi: hajupihka, pirunpihka
fr: ase fétide
gu: હિંગ
hi: हींग, हीँग, हिंग
hr: asafetida
hu: bűzös husáng, bűzös aszat
hy: քաղբան, անգուժատ
is: djöflatað
it: assafetida
kk: кеурексасыр
kn: ಇಂಗು
lo: ມະຫາຫິງ
ml: കായം
mr: हिंग
my: ရှိန်းခို
ne: हिङ
nl: asafoetida, duivelsdrek
pl: asafetyda, czarcie łajno, smrodzieniec
ps: انجه‎
pt: assafétida
sa: हिङ्गु
sv: dyvelsträck
ta: பெருங்காயம்
te: ఇంగువ
tg: ров
th: มหาหิงคุ์
tl: inggo, asapetida
tr: şeytantersi, hıthıt

en: black cumin, black caraway, nigella, kalonji seeds, black onion seed, black onion seeds
bg: черен кимион
ca: pebreta, pebretera
de: Schwarzkümmel
es: abésoda, agenuz, ajenuz, arañuel
fr: cumin noir, graine de Nigelle
hr: crni kim
it: cumino nero
la: nigella sativa
lv: Sējas melnsēklīte
nl: zwarte komijn, nigellazaad
pl: czarnuszka, czarnuszki
ro: Negrilica
sh: Crni kumin
sv: Svartkummin

en: caraway
af: karwy
ar: كروياء
az: adi zirə
be: кмен звычайны
bg: ким
bn: কারোয়া
bo: གོ་སྙོད།
bs: kim
ca: alcaravia
cs: kmín, kmín kořenný
cv: ахаль çерçи кĕпçи
cy: carwy
da: kommen
de: Kümmel
dv: ފަރިހި ދަމުއި
el: κιουμέλ, αγριοκύμινο
eo: karvio
es: alcaravea
et: harilik köömen
eu: txarpoil
fa: زیره
fi: kumina
fr: carvi
ga: cearbhas
gl: carvea
he: כרוויה תרבותית
hi: शाहजीरा
hr: kim
hu: fűszerkömény
hy: քիմիոն, քիմոն սովորական
id: jintan
ig: cara way
is: kúmen
it: carvi
ja: キャラウェイ
jv: caraway
ka: ძირა
ko: 캐러웨이
ku: jaj
la: Carum carvi, Careum
lb: Kimmel
lt: kmynas, paprastasis kmynas
lv: ķimenes, pļavas ķimene
mk: ким
ml: കരിഞ്ചീരകം
mn: гоньд
mr: शहाजिरे
ms: jintan
mt: karwija
my: ကရဝေး
nb: karve
nl: karwij
nn: karve
os: хуымæтæджы фыдхос
pa: زيره
pl: kminek, kminek zwyczajny
ps: زيره
pt: alcaravia
ro: chimen
ru: тмин обыкновенный
sh: kim
sk: kmín, rasca lúčna
sl: kumina, navadna kumina
sq: qimnoni
sr: ким, kim
sv: kummin
te: కరం కరవే
tg: карвиё
th: เทียนตากบ
tt: ак әнис
uk: кмин, кмин звичайний
uz: zira urug'lari
zh: 葛缕子, 葛縷子

en: caraway seed
ca: llavors d'alcaravia
da: kommenfrø
de: Kümmelsamen
el: σπόρος κύμινου
es: semilla de alcaravea, semillas de alcaravea
et: köömned
fr: graine de carvi, graines de carvi
hr: sjeme kima, sjemenke kima
it: seme di cumino, seme di carvi, seme di cumino dei prati
ja: キャラウェイシード
la: Carvi fructus
lt: kmynų sėklos
lv: ķimeņu sēklas
nl: karwijzaad
pl: nasiona kminku
pt: semente de cominho, semente de alcaravia
ro: semințe de chimen, seminte de chimen
ru: семена тмина
sl: seme navadne kumine
sv: kumminfrön
yi: קימל זוימען
zh: 葛缕子籽, 葛縷子籽

en: caraway essence
nb: karveessens

en: cayenne pepper, cayenne
af: brandrissie
ar: فليفلة حريفة
bg: кайенски пипер
ca: pebre de caiena
cs: kajenský pepř, cayenský pepř
da: cayennepeber
de: cayennepfeffer, Cayenne-pfeffer
el: πιπέρι καγιέν, καγιέν
eo: kajena pipro
es: pimienta de cayena, pimienta roja, cayena, ají cayena, pimienta roja picante
et: kajenni paprika
eu: kaiena
fi: cayennepippuri, cayenne
fr: piment de cayenne, cayenne, poivre de cayenne
gl: pementa de caiena
he: פלפל קאיין
hr: kajenski papar, kajenska paprika, kajenska papričica
hu: cayennebors
hy: Կայենեյան պղպեղ
id: cabai cayenne
it: pepe di cayenna, peperoncino di cayenna
ja: カイエンペッパー
ko: 카옌고추
la: capsicum annuum ‘cayenne’
lb: cayennepeffer
ms: lada cayenne
nb: kajennepepper, cayennepepper
nl: cayennepeper
nn: kajennepepar
pl: pieprz cayenne, pieprz kajeński, papryka cayenne
pt: pimenta-caiena
ro: piper cayenne
ru: перец кайенский
sk: kajenské korenie
sv: cayennepeppar, cayenne, kajennpeppar, cayenpeppar
th: พริกชี้ฟ้า
tl: siling kayena
uk: Перець каєнський
zh: 牛角椒

en: dried cayenne pepper
de: getrockneter Cayennepfeffer
es: pimienta de cayena seca
fr: piment de Cayenne séché
hr: sušeni kajenski papar
it: peperoncino di Cayenna essiccato
nl: cayennepeper gedroogd

en: curry
xx: curry
ar: كاري
bg: къри
br: kurri
ca: curri
cs: kari
cy: cyrri
da: karry
de: Curry, Curry-Gewürz
el: Κάρυ
es: curry
et: karri
fa: ماليدن
fi: curry
fr: curry, mélange d'épice curry
gu: શાક
hi: सालन
hu: curry
it: curry
ja: カレー
lt: karis
mr: कोरड्यास
nb: karri
nl: kerrie, curry
nn: karri
pa: ਰੱਸਾ
pl: curry, mieszanka przypraw curry, curry w proszku, przyprawa curry
pt: caril
ru: карри
sa: सलवण
sk: kari
sl: kari
sv: curry
ta: கறி
te: కర్రీ
zh: 咖哩

en: curry powder
ar: مسحوق الكاري
bg: къри на прах
ca: Curri en pols
cs: Kari koření
de: Currypulver
eo: karea pulvoro
es: curry en polvo
fa: ادویه کاری
fi: curryjauhe
fr: curry en poudre, poudre de curry
he: תבלין קארי
hu: curry por
id: Bubuk kari
it: curry in polvere
ja: カレー粉
ko: 커리 가루
lt: Karis (prieskoniai)
ms: Serbuk kari
ne: गरम मसला
nl: kerriepoeder, currypoeder
pt: Caril em pó
sv: currypulver
uk: Карі (приправа), Карри
zh: 咖喱粉

en: curry paste
da: karrypasta
de: currypaste
es: pasta de curry
fi: currytahna
fr: pâte de curry
hr: curry pasta
it: pasta di curry
ko: 커리 페이스트
nb: karripasta
nn: karripasta
pl: pasta curry
sv: currypasta, curry pasta

en: red curry paste
da: rød karrypasta
de: rote currypaste
fi: punainen currytahna
fr: pâte de curry rouge
hr: crvena curry pasta
it: pasta di curry rosso
nb: rød karripasta
nn: raud karripasta
pl: czerwona pasta curry
sv: röd currypasta

en: mace
ca: Macís
cs: Muškátový květ
da: muskatblomme
de: Macis, Muskatblüte, Macisblüte
eo: Maciso
es: Macis, maza
fi: muskotinkukka, muskottikukka
fr: macis
hr: macis
it: Macis
ko: 메이스
nb: muskatblomme
nl: foelie
oc: Macís
pl: kwiat muszkatołowy, macis
pt: Macis
ru: Мацис
sk: Muškátový kvet
sv: muskotblomma
uk: Мацис

en: turmeric
af: borrie
am: እርድ
ar: كركم
bg: куркума
bn: হলুদ
bs: kurkuma
ca: cúrcuma
cs: kurkuma
cy: turmeric
da: gurkemeje
de: Kurkuma, Curcuma
dv: ރީނދޫ
el: κουρκουμάς
eo: kurkumo
es: cúrcuma, curcuma
et: kurkum
eu: kurkuma
fa: زردچوبه
fi: kurkuma, maustekurkuma
fr: curcuma, curcuma rond
ga: tuirmeiric
gd: curcuma
gl: cúrcuma
gu: હળદર
he: כורכום
hi: हल्दी
hr: kurkuma, curcuma domestica, korijen kurkume
hu: kurkuma
id: kunyit
io: kurkumo
is: kúrkúma
it: curcuma, turmerico
ja: ウコン, ターメリック
jv: kunir
kn: ಅರಿಸಿನ
ko: 울금
ku: zerdeçal
la: curcuma longa
lt: ciberžolė, turmerikas
lv: kurkuma
mk: куркума
ml: മഞ്ഞൾ
mr: हळद
ms: kunyit
my: နနွင်း
nb: gurkemeie
ne: बेसार
nl: kurkuma, geelwortel, curcuma
nn: gurkemeie
oc: curcuma
or: ହଳଦୀ
pa: ਹਲਦੀ
pl: kurkuma, kurkumy, ostryż długi, korzeń kurkumy, korzenia kurkumy
ps: کورکمن
pt: curcuma
ro: curcumă, curcuma
ru: куркума, куркумин, куркума длинная
sa: हरिद्रा
sd: ھيڊ
si: කහ
sl: kurkuma
so: huruud
sr: куркума
su: konéng
sv: gurkmeja
sw: manjano
ta: மஞ்சள்
te: పసుపు
tg: зардчӯба
th: ขมิ้น
tl: luyang-dilaw
to: ango
tr: zerdeçal
ty: rea tahiti
uk: куркума
ur: ہلدی
vi: nghệ
zh: 薑黃

en: turmeric powder
bg: куркума на прах
de: Curcumapulver, Kurkumapulver
fi: kurkumajauhe
fr: poudre de curcuma, curcuma moulu, curcuma déshydraté
hr: kurkuma u prahu
it: curcuma in polvere
pl: kurkuma w proszku, sproszkowana kurkuma, przyprawa kurkuma, kurkuma mielona, sproszkowana kurkuma

en: nutmeg
cs: muškát
da: muskat
de: Muskat
dv: ތަކޫވައް
el: μοσχοκαρυδιά
eo: muskato
fr: muscade
ga: noitmig
gd: cnò-mheannt
gu: જાયફળ
he: אגוז מוסקט
hi: जायफल
hr: muškat
hu: szerecsendió
hy: մշկընկույզ
id: pala
io: muskado
is: múskat
it: noce moscata
ja: ニクズク属
jv: pala
ka: ჯავზის ხე
kn: ಜಾಪತ್ರೆ
ko: 육두구
la: myristica fragrans
ml: ജാതിക്ക
mr: जायफळ
ms: buah pala
my: ဇာတိပ္ဖိုလ်
nl: nootmuskaat
pa: ਜਾਇਫਲ
pl: gałka muszkatołowa, gałki muszkatołowej
ro: nucșoară
sa: जातीफलम्
si: සාදික්කා
sl: muškatovec
su: pala
sv: muskot
sw: kungumanga
ta: ஜாதிக்காய்
te: జాజికాయ
th: จันทน์เทศ
tl: moskada
to: kotone
tr: muskat
uk: мускатник, мускатний горіх
ur: جائفل
vi: hạt nhục đậu khấu
yi: מושקאט נוס
zh: 肉豆蔻

en: nutmeg nut
bg: индийско орехче
bs: muskatni oraščić
ca: nou moscada
cs: muškátový oříšek, muškátový ořech
cv: мускат мăйăрĕ
da: muskatnød
de: Muskatnuss
es: nuez moscada
eu: intxaur muskatu
fa: جوز هندی
fi: muskottipähkinä
fr: noix de muscade
ga: crann noitmigí
gl: noz moscada
hr: muškatni oraščić, muškatni orašćić
it: noce moscata in polvere
kk: мускат жаңғағы
lt: muskatmedis
lv: muskatrieksti
mk: морско оревче
mt: noċemuskata
nb: muskatnøtts
oc: notz muscada
pl: muszkatołowiec, orzech muszkatołowca
pt: noz-moscada
ru: мускатный орех
sh: muškatov oraščić
sv: muskotnöt

en: ground nutmeg
de: Muskatnuss gemahlen, gemahlene Muskatnuss
fi: jauhettu muskottipähkinä
fr: muscade-moulue, noix de muscade en poudre
it: voce moscata macinata

en: cardamom, cardamon, Elaichi
af: kardamom
ar: هال
bg: кардамон
bs: kardamom
cs: kardamom
cy: cardamom
da: kardemomme
de: kardamom
el: κακουλέ
eo: kardamomo
es: cardamomo
et: kardemon
fa: هل
fi: kardemumma
fr: cardamome, cardamone
gd: càrdamon
gl: cardamomo
gu: ઇલાયચી
he: הל
hi: इलायची
hr: kardamom
hy: հիլ
id: kapulaga
io: kardamomo
it: cardamomo
ja: カルダモン
jv: kapulaga
kk: кардамон
ko: 카다멈
lv: kardamons
mk: кардамон
mr: वेलदोडे
ms: buah pelaga
nl: kardemom, cardamon, kardemon, kardamom, cardemon
pl: kardamon
ps: لاچی
pt: cardamomo
ro: cardamon
ru: кардамон
sa: एला
sd: ننڍو ڦوٽو
sh: kardamon
sr: кардамон
su: kapulaga
sv: kardemumma
ta: ஏலம்
te: ఏలకులు
th: กระวาน
tr: kakule
uk: кардамон
yi: קארדעמאן

en: green cardamom, elettaria cardamomum
de: grüner Kardamom, grüner Cardamom
fr: cardamome verte
hr: zeleni kardamom
it: cardamomo verde
la: elettaria cardamomum

en: black cardamom
ar: هيل أسود
az: bizvari hil
bg: черен кардамон
bo: ཀ་ཀོ་ལ།
ca: cardamom negre
cs: nepálský kardamom
de: Schwarzer Kardamom, schwarzer Cardamom
el: mαύρο κάρδαμο
eo: amomo
fa: هل سیاه
fr: cardamome noire
gu: એલચો
hi: बड़ी इलायची
hr: crni kardamom
it: cardamomo nero
ja: アモムム・スブタトゥム
jv: kapulaga ireng
ko: 향두구
la: Amomum subulatum
ml: പേരേലം
nb: svart kardemomme
ne: अलैंची
nl: zwarte kardemom
sv: svart kardemumma
ta: கருப்பு ஏலக்காய்
uk: чорний кардамон
vi: thảo quả
zh: 香豆蔻